Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 23 Eye Banks

Cross references.

Anatomical gifts, §

44-5-140

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Eye banks, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Subject 111-8-28.

31-23-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Eye bank” means a nonprofit facility which is maintained and operated for the extraction, removal, care, storage, preservation, and use of human eyes or parts thereof for purposes of sight preservation or restoration, medical education, instruction pertaining to sight preservation or restoration, or research, which facility is operated by, under, or in affiliation with a hospital for the care of human beings or a medical school in conjunction with the department or school of ophthalmology of such medical school.

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, trustee, association, or combination thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 582, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2001, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1499, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 832, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-17/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-23-2.
Effect on eye donations of the “Georgia Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act.”

Any donation of a person’s eyes or any part thereof shall be made in accordance with Article 6 of Chapter 5 of Title 44, the “Georgia Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 582, §§ 3, 4; Code 1933, §§ 88-2003, 88-2004, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 503, § 4/SB 405.

31-23-3.
Hospitals or medical schools which may operate eye banks; right of eye banks to receive gifts, donations, and bequests.

Any facility, hospital, or any medical school in conjunction with the department or school of ophthalmology of such medical school, alone or in further conjunction with other charitable organizations, may establish and maintain an eye bank in, under, or in affiliation with such hospital or medical school upon approval for the establishment of the eye bank by the Department of Community Health, if the eye bank meets the medical standards approved by the Eye Bank Association of America and such facility, hospital, or medical school is a nonprofit organization and is not a subsidiary of a for profit corporation or business entity. Upon the establishment of any eye bank as authorized in this Code section, the extraction, removal, care, preservation, storage, and use of human eyes or parts thereof for any of the purposes for which eye banks may be established may begin in such facility or as authorized by such facility. The eye bank shall have the right to receive gifts, donations, and bequests for the purposes stated in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 582, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-2002, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1499, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 832, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 368, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2007).

31-23-4.
Powers of department.

The department is empowered to approve or disapprove the establishment of an eye bank by any group desiring to establish one in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the department; to exercise such control, inspection, and supervision of established eye banks as the department determines to be proper; and to terminate, for good cause, its approval of the maintenance and operation of an eye bank.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 582, § 7; Code 1933, § 88-2007, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-23-5.
Persons authorized to extract eyes; compensation therefor; liability of persons operating eye banks or having custody or control of donor’s body.

Upon the death of any donor, the persons holding a donor’s unrevoked instrument of donation and maintaining and operating the donee eye bank may authorize any physician, or any embalmer licensed under Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 43, as now or hereafter amended, who has completed a course of training in eye extraction approved by the department, or any technician trained by and authorized by the eye bank to extract and remove the donated eyes or parts thereof for the eye bank in accordance with sound medical practices.

The person or persons extracting and removing the donated eyes or parts thereof shall receive no compensation for such services other than that established, approved, and paid by the persons maintaining and operating the eye bank.

Neither persons maintaining and operating eye banks, nor their agents, nor persons having custody or control of a deceased donor’s body shall be liable criminally or civilly to any person or any person’s estate for the removal of eyes or parts thereof donated and removed in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 582, § 5; Code 1933, § 88-2005, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 234, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1559, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1499, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 31.

31-23-6.
[Reserved] Removal of eye or corneal tissue.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 811, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1328, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 611, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 31; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 503, § 3/SB 405, effective July 1, 2008.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 503, § 3/SB 405 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2008.

31-23-7.
Liability of donor or donor’s estate.

In no event shall any donor or donor’s estate incur any liability for any expense connected with or resulting from the donation, extraction, removal, care, preservation, storage, or use of such donor’s eyes or parts thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 582, § 6; Code 1933, § 88-2006, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-23-8.
Effect of chapter upon existing methods of treatment or instruction.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect, interfere with, or change presently existing methods of the medical or scientific operation, treatment, examination, or instruction pertaining to the eyes of human beings as the same is now carried on in the hospitals or under the medical schools of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 582, § 8; Code 1933, § 88-2008, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1499, § 4.

31-23-9.
Penalty.

It shall be unlawful:

For any person to sell either his eyes or any parts thereof or the eyes or any parts thereof of another person or to receive any remuneration for the giving of a human eye or any part thereof;

For the person or persons operating and maintaining any eye bank to sell any donated eye or donated part thereof or knowingly to extract, remove, or take possession of any human eye or part thereof for which any person received compensation or remuneration; or

For any person or persons to establish or operate any eye bank without approval of the department or otherwise not in accordance with this chapter.

Any person who violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 582, § 9; Code 1933, § 88-2009, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1499, § 5.